vi: Vừa vặn: Dáng boyfriend; Dáng mom; Ống ôm sát; Ôm vừa vặn; Ống thẳng; Ống côn; Rộng; Khác
bg-BG: Прилягане: Приятел; Мама; Кльощав крак; Слаб; Прав крак; Конусовиден крак; Широк; Други
zh-CN: 修身: 男朋友; 母亲; 窄管; 修身; 直筒; 小裤脚; 宽; 其他
pt-PT: Ajuste: Calças boyfriend; Calças mom; Calças skinny; Calças slim; Calças retas; Calças tapered; Largo; Outro
sl-SI: Prileganje: Fantovske; Raven kroj; Oprijeta hlačnica; Oprijet; Ravna hlačnica; Na korenček; Širok; Drugo
it: Vestibilità: Fidanzato; Mamma; Gamba stretta; Slim; Gamba dritta; Gamba affusolata; Larga; Altro
fi: Sovite: Poikaystävä; Äiti; Kapeat lahkeet; Hoikka; Suorat lahkeet; Kapenevat lahkeet; Leveä; Muu
de: Passform: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny leg; Slim; Straight leg; Tapered leg; Weit; Sonstiges
pl: Dopasowanie: Chłopak; Mama; Model skinny leg; Slim; Proste nogawki; Zwężane nogawki; Szerokość; Inne
cs: Střih/provedení: Boyfriend; Těhotenské; Úzké nohavice; Štíhlé; Rovné nohavice; Zúžené nohavice; Široké; Jiné
hu: Illeszkedés: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny; Slim; Straight; Tapered; Széles; Egyéb
el: Εφαρμογή: Boyfriend; Mom; Σωλήνας; Λεπτό; Ίσιο; Καμπάνα; Ευρυγώνιος; Άλλο
tr: Fit: Boyfriend; Mom; Dar paça; Slim; Boru paça; Daralan paça; Geniş; Diğer
zh-TW: 適合: 男友款; 媽媽款; 窄管款; 修身款; 直筒款; 錐形款; 寬; 其他
ja: フィット: ボーイフレンド; マム; スキニー; スリム; ストレート; テーパード; ワイド; その他
lt-LT: Kirpimas: Vyriško kirpimo; „Mom“ stiliaus džinsai; Siauromis klešnėmis; Priglundantys; Tiesiomis klešnėmis; Siaurėjančiomis klešnėmis; Plataus kirpimo; Kita
en: Fit: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny leg; Slim; Straight leg; Tapered leg; Wide; Other
es: Encaje: Novio; Madre; Pierna estrecha; Corte delgado; Pernera recta; Pernera cónica; Ancho; Otros
th: ฟิต: ทรงบอยเฟรนด์; ทรงมัม; ทรงสกินนี; ทรงสลิม; ทรงขากระบอก; ทรงขาสอบ; กว้าง; อื่นๆ
nb: Passform: Kjæreste; Mamma; Tynne bein; Slank; Rett bein; Avsmalnet bein; Bred; Annet
pt-BR: Ajuste: Namorado; Mãe; Perna magra; Magro; Perna reta; Perna cônica; Largo; Outro
da: Pasform: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny; Slim; Lige; Tilspidset; Bred; Andet
hr-HR: Kroj: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny; Slim; Ravni kroj; Sužene nogavice; Široki kroj; Ostalo
sk-SK: Strih: Priateľ; Mama; Štíhle nohy; Štíhly; Rovná noha; Zúžená noha; Široký; Iné
ru: Крой: Бойфренд; Мом; Скини; Слим; Прямые; Бананы; Широкие; Другой
ko: 핏: 보이프렌드; 엄마; 스키니 레그; 슬림; 스트레이트 레그; 테이퍼드 레그; 넓음; 기타
fr: Ajustement: Boyfriend; Maman; Skinny; Slim; Droit; Tapered; Large; Autre
ro-RO: Stil: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny; Slim; Croi drept; Picior conic; Larg; Altele
sv: Passform: Boyfriend; Mom; Skinny leg; Slim; Straight leg; Avsmalnande ben; Vid; Övrigt
nl: Pasvorm: Boyfriend; Mom; Smalle pijpen; Slank; Rechte pijpen; Toelopende pijpen; Breed; Andere